Utah statutes.
39-6-101.   Assault -- Aggravated assault.

(1)  A person subject to this chapter who attempts or offers with unlawful force or violence to do bodily harm to another person, whether or not the attempt or offer is completed, is guilty of assault and shall be punished as a military court directs.

(2)  A person subject to this chapter is guilty of aggravated assault and shall be punished as a military court directs, who:

(a)  commits an assault with a dangerous weapon or other means or force likely to produce death or serious bodily harm; or

(b)  commits an assault and intentionally inflicts serious bodily harm with or without using a weapon.

